Utah statutes.
34A-1-102.   Definitions.

Unless otherwise specified, as used in this title:

(1)  "Commission" means the Labor Commission created in Section 34A-1-103.

(2)  "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the commission appointed under Section 34A-1-201.

